Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.25
Interim controls, defined.

Interim controls means a set of measures designed to temporarily reduce human exposure or likely exposure to lead-based paint hazards, including specialized cleaning, repairs, maintenance, painting, temporary containment, ongoing monitoring of lead-based paint hazards or potential hazards, and the establishment and operation of management and resident education programs.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 27.